Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.170

County road budget—Budget as adopted filed with department of transportation.

Upon the final adoption of the county road budgets of the several counties, the county legislative authorities shall file a copy thereof in the office of the department of transportation.

[ 1984 c 7 s 36; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.170. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 6, part; 1943 c 82 s 7, part; 1937 c 187 s 56, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-56, part.]